Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; STATEWIDE TENANT EDUCATION AND HOTLINE SERVICE.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Housing Finance Agency for a statewide tenant education and hotline service that provides free and confidential legal advice for all Minnesota renters. new text end